Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1833
Public advocate; access to information; limitations.

The public advocate and his or her employees or agents shall have free access to all files, records, and documents of the commission except:

(1) Personal information in confidential personnel records;

(2) Records which represent the work product of legal counsel of the commission, and records of confidential or privileged communications between the members of the commission and its legal counsel, when the records relate to a proceeding before the commission in which the public advocate is, or is appearing for, a party; and

(3) Records that are designated as confidential pursuant to commission rules and regulations, except as permitted by a nondisclosure agreement between a specified representative of the public advocate and the commission and the person who claims the records at issue are confidential.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 33.